New York, session 2025-2026, A7568.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "school 2 libraries curation guidance act". 3 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 282-a to 4 read as follows: 5 § 282-a. School libraries curation guidance. 1. Twelve months after 6 the effective date of this section, the state librarian shall provide to 7 each school library system established under section two hundred eight- 8 y-two of this part guidance on the curation of library materials. Such 9 guidance shall include, but not be limited to: 10 (a) standards that ensure library material shall be provided for the 11 interest, information, and enlightenment of all students and present a 12 wide range of points of view in the collection; 13 (b) standards that ensure that library material shall not be removed 14 from a school library because of the origin, background, or views of the 15 library material or of those contributing to its creation; 16 (c) standards regarding the prohibition of censorship of library mate- 17 rials; 18 (d) standards that ensure that students have access to the widest 19 array of developmentally relevant library material created for the chro- 20 nological ages and grade levels of students in the school available to 21 schools; and 22 (f) procedures based on professional standards for a librarian to 23 review and deaccession library material within a school library on a 24 regular basis, which shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10850-02-5 A. 7568 2 1 library material's relevance; (ii) the condition of the library materi- 2 al; (iii) the availability of duplicates; (iv) the availability of more 3 recent developmentally relevant library material created for the chrono- 4 logical ages and grade levels of students in the school; and (v) the 5 continued demand for the library material. 6 2. The state librarian shall maintain a list of library school systems 7 that have adopted policies that meet the minimum standards set forth in 8 such guidance and such list shall be published on the website of the 9 department. 10 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.